test_lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Root
	Nouns;

LEXICON Nouns
jana End;
katosi End; 
kasku End; 
naapurit End;
myrsky  End;
naapurit End;
eversti End;
täi  End;
epäily End;
puusto End;
avaruus End;
avain   End;
apu     End;
säie    End;
äsken   End;
kauan   End;
irstas  End;
uoma    End;
vihreää End;
aatto   End;
taloaan End;

! loanwords
aortta   End;
hamstraaja End;
hygienia End;
abstrakti End;
maistraatti End;
prosentti End;
trendi	End;
flunssa End;
klaava	End;
kraateri	End;
stressi	End;
sprinkleri	End;
kissa End;
demonstraatio End;
orkestrointi End;
katastrofi End;
ekstra End;

! diftong weirdness
kielien End;
pienen	End;
pienien End;
karies	End;
liueta End;
liuote End;
oieta End;
vihkiytyä End;
hauissa	End; ! Note: the hyphenation differs, depending if this is hauki or haku

! others
kiuas	End;
0 End; 

LEXICON End
0:^  #; 


END
